Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS ââ 3 ADMINISTRATION. There is appropriated from the general 4 fund of the state to the department for the blind for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 10 equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,207,190 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 88.98 13 DIVISION II 14 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 15 Sec. 2. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 16 from the general fund of the state to the department of 17 education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 18 ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof 19 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 20 1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 21 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 22 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 23 equivalent positions: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,073,808 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 70.23 26 b. By January 15, 2026, the department shall submit 27 a written report to the general assembly detailing the 28 departmentâs antibullying programming and current and projected 29 expenditures for such programming for the fiscal year beginning 30 July 1, 2025. 31 2. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 34 equivalent positions: 35 -1- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 1/ 26 S.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 721,779 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 9.12 2 3. PUBLIC BROADCASTING DIVISION 3 For salaries, support, maintenance, capital expenditures, 4 and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 5 full-time equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,116,032 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 58.38 8 4. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION 9 For reimbursement for career and technical education 10 expenditures made by regional career and technical education 11 planning partnerships in accordance with section 256.136: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,952,459 13 5. SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE 14 For use as state matching moneys for federal programs that 15 shall be disbursed according to federal regulations, including 16 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and 17 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,176,797 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 25.40 20 6. BIRTH TO AGE THREE SERVICES 21 a. For expansion of the federal Individuals with 22 Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, Pub. L. No. 23 108-446, as amended to January 1, 2018, birth through age three 24 services due to increased numbers of children qualifying for 25 those services: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,721,400 27 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, 28 $383,769 shall be allocated to the child health specialty 29 clinics administered by the state university of Iowa in order 30 to provide additional support for infants and toddlers who are 31 born prematurely, drug-exposed, or medically fragile. 32 7. EARLY HEAD START PROJECTS 33 a. For early head start projects: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 574,500 35 -2- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 2/ 26 S.F. _____ b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 1 used for implementation and expansion of early head start 2 pilot projects addressing the comprehensive cognitive, social, 3 emotional, and developmental needs of children from birth to 4 age three, including prenatal support for qualified families. 5 The projects shall promote healthy prenatal outcomes and 6 healthy family functioning, and strengthen the development of 7 infants and toddlers in low-income families. Priority shall be 8 given to those organizations that have previously qualified for 9 and received state funding to administer an early head start 10 project. 11 8. STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT AND TEACHER QUALITY PROGRAM 12 For purposes of the student achievement and teacher quality 13 program established pursuant to chapter 284 , and for not more 14 than the following full-time equivalent positions: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,990,467 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.02 17 9. STATEWIDE STUDENT ASSESSMENT 18 a. For distribution to the Iowa testing program by the 19 department of education on behalf of school districts and 20 accredited nonpublic schools to offset the costs associated 21 with a statewide student assessment administered in accordance 22 with section 256.7, subsection 21 , paragraph âbâ: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 24 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 25 than $300,000 shall be distributed to the Iowa testing programs 26 within the state university of Iowa college of education 27 to offset the costs of administering the statewide student 28 assessment at accredited nonpublic schools. 29 10. STATEWIDE CLEARINGHOUSE TO EXPAND WORK-BASED LEARNING 30 For support costs associated with the creation of a 31 statewide clearinghouse to expand work-based learning as a part 32 of the future ready Iowa initiative: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 34 11. POSTSECONDARY SUMMER CLASSES FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS 35 -3- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 3/ 26 S.F. _____ PROGRAM 1 For support costs associated with the creation of a program 2 to provide additional moneys for resident high school pupils 3 enrolled in grades 9 through 12 to attend a community college 4 for college-level classes or attend a class taught by a 5 community college-employed instructor during the summer and 6 outside of the regular school year through a contractual 7 agreement between a community college and a school district 8 under the future ready Iowa initiative: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 10 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 11 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 12 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 13 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 14 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 15 fiscal year. 16 12. JOBS FOR AMERICAâS GRADUATES 17 For school districts to reinforce combined efforts and 18 regional initiatives that accelerate para-educator and teacher 19 credential attainment and to provide direct services to the 20 most at-risk middle school or high school students enrolled 21 in school districts through direct intervention by a jobs for 22 Americaâs graduates specialist: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,646,450 24 13. ATTENDANCE CENTER PERFORMANCE/GENERAL INTERNET SITE AND 25 DATA SYSTEM SUPPORT 26 For administration of a process for school districts to 27 establish specific performance goals and to evaluate the 28 performance of each attendance center operated by the district 29 in order to arrive at an overall school performance grade and 30 report card for each attendance center, for internet site 31 and data system support, and for not more than the following 32 full-time equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.83 35 -4- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 4/ 26 S.F. _____ 14. SUCCESSFUL PROGRESSION FOR EARLY READERS 1 For distribution to school districts for implementation 2 of section 279.68, subsection 2 , relating to successful 3 progression for early readers: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,824,782 5 15. EARLY WARNING SYSTEM FOR LITERACY 6 a. For purposes of purchasing a statewide license for an 7 early warning assessment and administering the early warning 8 system for literacy established in accordance with section 9 279.68 and rules adopted in accordance with section 256.7, 10 subsection 31 : 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,915,000 12 b. The department shall administer and distribute to school 13 districts and accredited nonpublic schools the early warning 14 assessment system that allows teachers to screen and monitor 15 student literacy skills from prekindergarten through grade 16 six. The department may charge school districts and accredited 17 nonpublic schools a fee for the system not to exceed the actual 18 costs to purchase a statewide license for the early warning 19 assessment minus the moneys received by the department under 20 this subsection. The fee shall be determined by dividing the 21 actual remaining costs to purchase the statewide license for 22 the school year by the number of pupils assessed under the 23 system in the current fiscal year. School districts may use 24 moneys received pursuant to section 257.10, subsection 11 , and 25 moneys received for purposes of implementing section 279.68, 26 subsection 2 , to pay the early warning assessment system fee. 27 16. IOWA READING RESEARCH CENTER 28 a. For purposes of the Iowa reading research center in 29 order to implement, in collaboration with the area education 30 agencies, the provisions of section 256.9, subsection 49 , 31 paragraph âcâ: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 33 b. From moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 34 than $250,000 shall be used for collaborations with the state 35 -5- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 5/ 26 S.F. _____ board of education relating to the approval of practitioner 1 preparation programs pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 3 , 2 paragraph âcâ, and with the board of educational examiners for 3 the establishment and continuing oversight of the advanced 4 dyslexia specialist endorsement pursuant to section 256.146, 5 subsection 21. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 6 ending June 30, 2026, the center shall submit a report to the 7 general assembly detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 8 purposes of this paragraph âbâ. 9 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 10 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 11 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 12 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 13 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 14 fiscal year. 15 17. COMPUTER SCIENCE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE 16 FUND 17 For deposit in the computer science professional development 18 incentive fund established under section 284.6A : 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 20 18. CHILDRENâS MENTAL HEALTH SCHOOL-BASED TRAINING AND 21 SUPPORT 22 a. For distribution to area education agencies for 23 school-based childrenâs mental health services, including 24 mental health awareness training for educators: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,383,936 26 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection for 27 distribution to area education agencies, $200,000 shall be 28 used for purposes of implementing a childrenâs grief and loss 29 rural pilot program to serve Iowa children in rural school 30 districts or accredited nonpublic schools. The pilot program 31 shall be administered by, and the moneys allocated pursuant to 32 this paragraph shall be distributed to, an existing statewide 33 not-for-profit health care organization that currently provides 34 grief and loss services to children. For the fiscal year 35 -6- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 6/ 26 S.F. _____ beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the health 1 care organization receiving moneys pursuant to this paragraph 2 shall prepare a report, in collaboration with the department 3 of education, detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 4 the purposes of this program and its outcomes, which shall be 5 submitted to the general assembly by September 30, 2026. 6 19. BEST BUDDIES IOWA 7 a. For school districts to create opportunities for 8 one-to-one friendships, integrated employment, and leadership 9 development for students with intellectual and developmental 10 disabilities: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,000 12 b. The department of education shall establish criteria for 13 the distribution of moneys appropriated under this subsection 14 and shall require an organization receiving moneys under this 15 subsection to annually report student identifying data for 16 students participating in the program to the department in the 17 manner prescribed by the department as a condition of receiving 18 such moneys. 19 20. MIDWESTERN HIGHER EDUCATION COMPACT 20 a. For distribution to the midwestern higher education 21 compact to pay Iowaâs member state annual obligation: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,000 23 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated 24 pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or 25 unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 26 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 27 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 28 21. NONPUBLIC SCHOOL CONCURRENT ENROLLMENT PAYMENTS TO 29 COMMUNITY COLLEGES 30 For payments to community colleges for the concurrent 31 enrollment of accredited nonpublic school students under 32 section 261E.8, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 34 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 35 -7- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 7/ 26 S.F. _____ department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 1 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 2 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 3 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 4 22. COMMUNITY COLLEGES 5 For general state financial aid to merged areas, as defined 6 in section 260C.2 , in accordance with section 260C.18C: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,858,161 8 23. IOWA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF 9 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 11 equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,049,644 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 121.00 14 24. IOWA EDUCATIONAL SERVICES FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY 15 IMPAIRED PROGRAM 16 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 17 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 18 equivalent positions: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,012,169 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 56.00 21 25. SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, AND MATHEMATICS 22 (STEM) COLLABORATIVE INITIATIVE 23 For purposes of the science, technology, engineering, 24 and mathematics (STEM) collaborative initiative established 25 pursuant to section 256.111, and for not more than the 26 following full-time equivalent positions: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,354,848 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5.50 29 a. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the 30 moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be expended for 31 salaries, staffing, institutional support, activities directly 32 related to recruitment of kindergarten through grade 12 33 mathematics and science teachers, and for ongoing mathematics 34 and science programming for students enrolled in kindergarten 35 -8- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 8/ 26 S.F. _____ through grade 12. 1 b. The department shall work with the community colleges to 2 develop STEM professional development programs for community 3 college instructors and STEM curriculum development. 4 c. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not less 5 than $500,000 shall be used to provide technology education 6 opportunities to high school, career academy, and community 7 college students through a public-private partnership, as 8 well as opportunities for students and faculties at these 9 institutions to secure broad-based information technology 10 certification. The partnership shall provide all of the 11 following: 12 (1) A research-based curriculum. 13 (2) Online access to the curriculum. 14 (3) Instructional software for classroom and student use. 15 (4) Certification of skills and competencies in a broad base 16 of information technology-related skill areas. 17 (5) Professional development for teachers. 18 (6) Deployment and program support, including but not 19 limited to integration with current curriculum standards. 20 d. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , of the moneys appropriated 21 in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 22 the close of the fiscal year, an amount equivalent to not more 23 than 5 percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection 24 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 25 summer programs for students until the close of the succeeding 26 fiscal year. 27 26. THERAPEUTIC CLASSROOM INCENTIVE FUND 28 For deposit in the therapeutic classroom incentive fund 29 established pursuant to section 256.25 : 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,351,382 31 27. ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM 32 For purposes of administering an online state job posting 33 system that allows the department of education, school 34 districts, charter schools, area education agencies, and 35 -9- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 9/ 26 S.F. _____ accredited nonpublic schools to post job openings on an 1 internet site: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 265,000 3 28. LEAD-K PROGRAM 4 For purposes of developing guidelines for a comprehensive 5 family support mentoring program that meets the language and 6 communication needs of families pursuant to section 256.106: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 8 29. DIVISION OF SPECIAL EDUCATION 9 For general supervision, oversight, compliance, employee 10 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes 11 within the area education agency regions and the department 12 of education main office, and for not more than the following 13 full-time equivalent positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 62.00 16 30. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT 17 For purposes of providing required professional development 18 to public and nonpublic schools: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,176,458 20 31. COLLEGE STUDENT AID COMMISSION 21 a. Administration 22 For general administration salaries, support, maintenance, 23 and miscellaneous purposes, and for the administration of the 24 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 25 program in accordance with section 256.228, including salaries, 26 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes related to the 27 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 28 program, and for not more than the following full-time 29 equivalent positions: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 591,533 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.95 32 b. National guard service scholarship program 33 For purposes of providing national guard service 34 scholarships under the program established in section 256.210: 35 -10- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 10/ 26 S.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,600,000 1 c. All Iowa opportunity scholarship program 2 (1) For purposes of the all Iowa opportunity scholarship 3 program established pursuant to section 256.212: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,229,468 5 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, if the 6 moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph exceed $500,000, 7 âeligible institutionâ as defined in section 256.212 shall, 8 during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, include 9 accredited private institutions as defined in section 256.183. 10 d. Teach Iowa scholar program 11 For purposes of the teach Iowa scholar program established 12 pursuant to section 256.218: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 650,000 14 e. Rural veterinarian loan repayment program 15 For purposes of the rural veterinarian loan repayment 16 program established pursuant to section 256.226: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 18 f. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar 19 scholarship program 20 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce 21 last-dollar scholarship fund established pursuant to section 22 256.228: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,927,005 24 g. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant program 25 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant 26 fund established pursuant to section 256.229: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 28 h. Iowa workforce grant and incentive program 29 For deposit in the Iowa workforce grant and incentive 30 program fund created in section 256.230: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,500,000 32 i. Health care professional incentive program 33 For deposit in the health care professional incentive 34 program fund created in section 256.222, if enacted in 2025 35 -11- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 11/ 26 S.F. _____ Iowa Acts, Senate File 618, 2025 Iowa Acts, House File 972, or 1 any successor legislation: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 3 Sec. 3. IOWA SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND 4 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled 5 worker and job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the 6 department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 7 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 8 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 9 designated: 10 1. For purposes of providing skilled workforce shortage 11 tuition grants in accordance with section 256.227: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 13 2. For deposit in the workforce training and economic 14 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,100,000 16 From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not 17 more than $100,000 shall be used by the department for 18 administration of the workforce training and economic 19 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A . 20 3. For capital projects at community colleges that meet the 21 definition of the term âvertical infrastructureâ in section 22 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 24 Moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be disbursed 25 pursuant to section 260G.6, subsection 3 . Projects that 26 qualify for moneys appropriated in this subsection must include 27 at least one of the following: 28 a. Accelerated career education program capital projects. 29 b. Major renovations and major repair needs, including 30 health, life, and fire safety needs, including compliance with 31 the federal Americans with Disabilities Act. 32 4. For deposit in the pathways for academic career and 33 employment fund established pursuant to section 260H.2 : 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,800,000 35 -12- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 12/ 26 S.F. _____ 5. For deposit in the gap tuition assistance fund 1 established pursuant to section 260I.2 : 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 3 6. For support costs associated with administering a 4 workforce preparation outcome reporting system for the purpose 5 of collecting and reporting data relating to the educational 6 and employment outcomes of workforce preparation programs 7 receiving moneys pursuant to this section: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 75,000 9 7. For STEM best: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 11 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 12 section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 13 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 14 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 15 succeeding fiscal year. 16 Sec. 4. CHIROPRACTIC LOAN FUNDS. Notwithstanding section 17 256.204, the moneys deposited in the chiropractic loan 18 revolving fund created pursuant to section 256.204 for the 19 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 20 may be used for purposes of the chiropractic loan forgiveness 21 program established in section 256.205. 22 Sec. 5. PRESCRIPTION DRUG COSTS. The department of 23 administrative services shall pay the Iowa school for the deaf 24 and the Iowa educational services for the blind and visually 25 impaired program the moneys collected from the counties during 26 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for expenses relating 27 to prescription drug costs for students attending the Iowa 28 school for the deaf and the Iowa educational services for the 29 blind and visually impaired program. 30 DIVISION III 31 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 32 Sec. 6. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 33 from the general fund of the state to the state board of 34 regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 35 -13- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 13/ 26 S.F. _____ June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 1 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 2 1. OFFICE OF STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 3 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 4 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 5 equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 764,642 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.48 8 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 9 30, 2026, the state board of regents shall submit a quarterly 10 financial report to the general assembly in a format agreed 11 upon by the state board of regents office and the legislative 12 services agency. The report submitted for the quarter ending 13 December 31, 2025, shall include the five-year graduation rates 14 for the regents universities. 15 b. For distribution to the western Iowa regents resource 16 center: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 268,297 18 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 19 June 30, 2026, the state board of regents and the institutions 20 of higher learning governed by the state board of regents 21 shall not reduce moneys budgeted for the fiscal year for the 22 institutionsâ police departments. 23 d. For allocation in equal parts by the state board of 24 regents to the state university of Iowa, the Iowa state 25 university of science and technology, and the university 26 of northern Iowa to support the John Pappajohn centers for 27 entrepreneurship: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 29 The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be 30 used to supplement, not supplant, any other funding received by 31 the John Pappajohn centers for entrepreneurship. 32 2. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 33 a. General university 34 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 35 -14- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 14/ 26 S.F. _____ aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the 1 following full-time equivalent positions: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,496,355 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5,058.55 4 b. Oakdale campus 5 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 6 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 7 equivalent positions: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,103,819 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 38.25 10 c. State hygienic laboratory 11 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 12 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 13 equivalent positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,822,610 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 102.51 16 d. Family practice program 17 For allocation by the dean of the college of medicine, with 18 approval of the advisory board, to qualified participants 19 to carry out the provisions of chapter 148D for the family 20 practice residency education program, including salaries 21 and support, and for not more than the following full-time 22 equivalent positions: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,220,598 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.71 25 e. Child health care services 26 For specialized child health care services, including 27 childhood cancer diagnostic and treatment network programs, 28 rural comprehensive care for hemophilia patients, and the 29 Iowa high-risk infant follow-up program, including salaries 30 and support, and for not more than the following full-time 31 equivalent positions: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 634,502 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.16 34 f. Statewide cancer registry 35 -15- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 15/ 26 S.F. _____ For the statewide cancer registry, and for not more than the 1 following full-time equivalent positions: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 143,410 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.10 4 g. Substance abuse consortium 5 For distribution to the Iowa consortium for substance abuse 6 research and evaluation, and for not more than the following 7 full-time equivalent positions: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 53,427 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .99 10 h. Center for biocatalysis 11 For the center for biocatalysis, and for not more than the 12 following full-time equivalent positions: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 696,342 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.28 15 i. Primary health care initiative 16 For the primary health care initiative in the college 17 of medicine, and for not more than the following full-time 18 equivalent positions: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 624,374 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.22 21 From the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 22 $254,889 shall be allocated to the department of family 23 practice at the state university of Iowa college of medicine 24 for family practice faculty and support staff. 25 j. Birth defects registry 26 For the birth defects registry, and for not more than the 27 following full-time equivalent positions: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 36,839 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .38 30 k. Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center 31 For the Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center, 32 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 33 positions: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 156,389 35 -16- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 16/ 26 S.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.75 1 l. Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 2 technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative 3 For the Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 4 technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative established 5 pursuant to section 263.8A : 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 463,616 7 m. Iowa flood center 8 For the Iowa flood center for use by the universityâs college 9 of engineering pursuant to section 466C.1 : 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,205,593 11 n. College of nursing 12 For employing additional instructors in the college of 13 nursing to increase the number of students who graduate from 14 the college of nursing: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 16 o. Iowa cancer assessment and intervention plan 17 For purposes of developing an Iowa cancer assessment and 18 intervention plan, under the direction of and on behalf of 19 the department of health and human services, pursuant to 20 an agreement between the state university of Iowa and the 21 department of health and human services: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 23 The Iowa cancer assessment and intervention plan must 24 include a thorough analysis of the potential causes of Iowaâs 25 high incidence of cancer in order to guide the department of 26 health and human services in developing targeted policies, 27 enhancing prevention and screening programs, raising public 28 awareness, and integrating evidence-based findings into 29 existing initiatives. The state university of Iowaâs 30 expenditure of moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 31 is contingent upon the state university of Iowa complying with 32 the terms, conditions, and prescribed deliverables in the 33 agreement between the university and the department of health 34 and human services. 35 -17- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 17/ 26 S.F. _____ 3. IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY 1 a. General university 2 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 3 aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the 4 following full-time equivalent positions: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,445,037 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 3,647.42 7 b. Agricultural experiment station 8 For the agricultural experiment station salaries, support, 9 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than 10 the following full-time equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 29,462,535 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 180.63 13 c. Cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 14 economics 15 For the cooperative extension service in agriculture 16 and home economics salaries, support, maintenance, and 17 miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 18 full-time equivalent positions: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 18,157,366 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 240.41 21 d. Preparing Iowaâs future ready workforce and fostering 22 innovation 23 For purposes of addressing the stateâs workforce needs in 24 the areas of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics 25 by expanding degree and certificate programs in the areas of 26 artificial intelligence, cybersecurity, computer science, 27 computer engineering, data science, software engineering, and 28 other high-demand areas related to technology, and fostering 29 innovation in the areas of digital agriculture, manufacturing, 30 water quality, vaccine delivery technologies, and biosciences: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 32 4. UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA 33 a. General university 34 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 35 -18- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 18/ 26 S.F. _____ aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the 1 following full-time equivalent positions: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,894,146 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,250.28 4 b. Real estate education program 5 For purposes of the real estate education program, and for 6 not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 123,523 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .86 9 c. Educators for Iowa 10 For purposes of recruiting additional students to 11 participate in educational opportunities that lead to teacher 12 licensure: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 14 Sec. 7. ENERGY COST-SAVINGS PROJECTS ââ FINANCING. For 15 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 16 2026, the state board of regents may use notes, bonds, or 17 other evidences of indebtedness issued under section 262.48 to 18 finance projects that will result in energy cost savings in an 19 amount that will cause the state board to recover the cost of 20 the projects within an average of six years. 21 DIVISION IV 22 STANDING APPROPRIATIONS 23 Sec. 8. AT-RISK CHILDREN. Notwithstanding the standing 24 appropriation in section 279.51 for the fiscal year beginning 25 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated 26 from the general fund of the state to the department of 27 education for programs for at-risk children under section 28 279.51 shall not be more than $10,524,389. The amount of any 29 reduction in this section shall be prorated among the programs 30 specified in section 279.51, subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ, âbâ, 31 and âcâ. 32 Sec. 9. WORK-STUDY APPROPRIATION. Notwithstanding section 33 256.209, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 34 ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from the general 35 -19- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 19/ 26 S.F. _____ fund of the state to the college student aid commission of 1 the department of education for the work-study program under 2 section 256.209 shall be zero. 3 Sec. 10. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes 4 effect July 1, 2025, if the portion of 2025 Iowa Acts, Senate 5 File 445, or any successor legislation, that reduces the 6 standing appropriation in section 279.51, subsection 1, is not 7 enacted: 8 The section of this division of this Act relating to the 9 standing appropriation in section 279.51, subsection 1. 10 DIVISION V 11 STATE PROGRAM ALLOCATION 12 Sec. 11. Section 284.13, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, c, 13 e, f, and g, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 14 a. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 15 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department, the amount of 16 five hundred eight thousand two hundred fifty dollars for the 17 issuance of national board certification awards in accordance 18 with section 256.44 . Of the amount allocated under this 19 paragraph, not less than eighty-five thousand dollars shall 20 be used to administer the ambassador to education position in 21 accordance with section 256.45 . 22 b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 23 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , up to seven hundred twenty-eight 24 thousand two hundred sixteen dollars to the department for 25 purposes of implementing the professional development program 26 requirements of section 284.6 , assistance in developing model 27 evidence for teacher quality committees established pursuant to 28 section 284.4, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ , and the evaluator 29 training program in section 284.10 . A portion of the funds 30 allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph may 31 be used by the department for administrative purposes and for 32 not more than four full-time equivalent positions. 33 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , 34 and ending June 30, 2025 2026 , an amount up to one million 35 -20- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 20/ 26 S.F. _____ seventy-seven thousand eight hundred ten dollars to the 1 department for the establishment of teacher development 2 academies in accordance with section 284.6, subsection 10 . A 3 portion of the funds allocated to the department for purposes 4 of this paragraph may be used for administrative purposes. 5 e. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 6 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department an amount up to 7 fifty thousand dollars for purposes of the fine arts beginning 8 teacher mentoring program established under section 256.34 . 9 f. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 10 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department an amount up 11 to six hundred twenty-six thousand one hundred ninety-one 12 dollars shall be used by the department for a delivery system, 13 in collaboration with area education agencies, to assist in 14 implementing the career paths and leadership roles considered 15 pursuant to sections 284.15 , 284.16 , and 284.17 , including but 16 not limited to planning grants to school districts and area 17 education agencies, technical assistance for the department, 18 technical assistance for districts and area education agencies, 19 training and staff development, and the contracting of external 20 expertise and services. In using moneys allocated for purposes 21 of this paragraph, the department shall give priority to school 22 districts with certified enrollments of fewer than six hundred 23 students. A portion of the moneys allocated annually to the 24 department for purposes of this paragraph may be used by the 25 department for administrative purposes and for not more than 26 five full-time equivalent positions. 27 g. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and 28 for each subsequent fiscal year, to the department, ten 29 million dollars for purposes of implementing the supplemental 30 assistance for high-need schools provisions of section 284.11 . 31 Annually, of the moneys allocated to the department for 32 purposes of this paragraph, up to one hundred thousand dollars 33 may be used by the department for administrative purposes and 34 for not more than one full-time equivalent position. 35 -21- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 21/ 26 S.F. _____ DIVISION VI 1 COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM 2 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ COURT REPORTER 3 EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the 4 general fund of the state to the department of education for 5 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 6 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 7 to be used for the purposes designated: 8 For deposit in the court reporter equipment grant program 9 fund created in section 256.231, as enacted by this Act: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50,000 11 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 256.231 Court reporter equipment 12 grant program. 13 1. A court reporter equipment grant program is established 14 to be administered by the college student aid commission. A 15 person is eligible to apply for a grant award under the program 16 if the person is enrolled in a court reporter training program 17 in this state. 18 2. Each applicant for the court reporter equipment grant 19 program shall, in accordance with the rules of the commission, 20 complete and file an application for a grant award. The 21 individual shall be responsible for the prompt submission of 22 any information required by the commission. 23 3. A recipient of a grant under the court reporter equipment 24 grant program must use the moneys awarded by the college 25 student aid commission for the purchase of court reporter 26 equipment and software for the court reporter training program 27 in which the recipient is participating. 28 4. The college student aid commission shall do all of the 29 following: 30 a. Establish the evaluation criteria to be used in 31 evaluating applications submitted under this section. The 32 college student aid commission shall give priority to 33 applicants who are doing court-related work. 34 b. Establish grant application materials, eligibility 35 -22- LSB 1003XC (6) 91 jda/jh 22/ 26 S.F. _____ requirements, award criteria, and award amounts. 1 5. A court reporter equipment grant program fund is created 2 in the state treasury under the control of the college student 3 aid commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund 4 are appropriated to the college student aid commission to 5 be used for grants awarded as provided under this section. 6 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund that remain 7 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall 8 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 9 purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 10 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 11 to the fund. 12 6. The college student aid commission shall adopt rules 13 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 14 Sec. 14. REPEAL. Sections 15.485 and 15.486, Code 2025, 15 are repealed. 16 Sec. 15. COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT INCENTIVE FUND 17 ââ TRANSFER TO COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM 18 FUND. Unencumbered and unobligated moneys remaining in the 19 court reporter equipment incentive fund established pursuant 20 to section 15.486, Code 2025, on the effective date of this 21 division of this Act, are transferred to the court reporter 22 equipment grant program fund created in section 256.231, as 23 enacted by this Act. 24 Sec. 16. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 25 designate section 256.231, as enacted by this Act, as a new 26 subpart within chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 4, entitled 27 âcourt reporter equipment grant programâ. 28